nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøydeler > Vindusdeler og -tilbehør til kjøretøy: Vindusglass; Vindusregulatorer; Vindustetninger; Vindusviskersystemer og deler
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части за моторни превозни средства > Части и аксесоари за прозорци на моторни превозни средства: Стъкло за прозорци; Стъклоповдигачи; Уплътнения за прозорци; Системи и компоненти за чистачки на предното стъкло
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 자동차 부품 > 자동차 창문 부품/부대용품: 창문 유리; 윈도우 레귤레이터; 윈도우 씰; 윈드실드 와이퍼 시스템 및 구성품
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Motor Vehicle Parts > Motor Vehicle Window Parts & Accessories: Window Glass; Window Regulators; Window Seals; Windshield Wiper Systems & Components
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées automobiles et motos > Pièces et accessoires pour fenêtres de véhicules: Vitrage de fenêtre; Lève-vitres; Joints de fenêtre; Systèmes et composants d'essuie-glace
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Peças para veículos motorizados > Acessórios e peças de janelas para veículos motorizados: Vidro de janela; Elevadores de vidros; Vedantes de janelas; Sistemas e componentes de limpa pára-brisas
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 自動車・バイク用パーツ > 自動車ウィンドウ用パーツ・関連用品: 窓ガラス; 窓レギュレーター; ウィンドウシール; フロントガラスワイパーシステム・コンポーネント
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças para veículos motorizados > Acessórios e peças de janelas para veículos motorizados: Vidro de janela; Reguladores de janela; Vedadores para janelas; Sistemas e componentes de limpadores de para-brisa
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Moottoriajoneuvojen osat > Moottoriajoneuvojen ikkunoiden osat ja tarvikkeet: Ikkunalasi; Ikkunoiden säätimet; Ikkunoiden tiivisteet; Tuulilasin pyyhinjärjestelmät ja -komponentit
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Componenti per veicoli a motore > Componenti e accessori di finestrini per veicoli a motore: Vetro per finestre; Alzacristalli; Guarnizioni per finestrini; Sistemi e componenti per tergicristalli
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese autovehicule > Piese și accesorii geamuri autovehicule: Geam; Regulatoare geamuri; Garnituri geamuri; Sisteme și componente pentru ștergătoare de parbriz
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 汽機車零配件 > 車窗零件/配件: 窗戶玻璃; 車窗升降機; 車窗封條; 擋風玻璃雨刷系統與組件
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Motorlu Taşıt Parçaları > Motorlu Araç Pencere Parçaları ve Aksesuarları: Pencere Camı; Cam Krikoları; Pencere Fitilleri; Ön Cam Silecek Sistemleri ve Bileşenleri
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Motorinių transporto priemonių dalys > Motorinių transporto priemonių langų dalys ir priedai: Langų stiklas; Lango reguliatoriai; Lango sandarikliai; Priekinio stiklo valytuvų sistemos ir komponentai
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนรถยนต์ > อุปกรณ์และชิ้นส่วนหน้าต่างรถยนต์: กระจกหน้าต่าง; ตัวควบคุมกระจกหน้าต่าง; ซีลหน้าต่าง; ระบบและส่วนประกอบของที่ปัดน้ำฝน
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly motorových vozidel > Součásti a příslušenství okének vozidel: Okenní skla; Okenní regulátory; Těsnění oken; Systémy a součásti stěračů čelního skla
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Phụ tùng xe cơ giới > Phụ kiện và linh kiện cửa sổ xe ô tô: Kính xe; Bộ điều chỉnh cửa sổ; Gioăng cửa sổ; Hệ thống và linh kiện cần gạt nước kính chắn gió
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części do pojazdów silnikowych > Części i akcesoria do szyb samochodowych: Szkło do okien; Regulatory okien; Uszczelki okienne; Systemy i komponenty wycieraczek samochodowych
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Gépjárműalkatrészek > Gépjárműablak-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők: Ablaküveg; Ablakszabályzók; Ablaktömítések; Ablaktörlő rendszerek és alkatrészek
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Motorvoertuigonderdelen > Raamonderdelen en -accessoires voor motorvoertuigen: Vensterglas; Raammechanismen; Raamrubbers; Ruitenwisserystemen en onderdelen
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi za motorna vozila > Dijelovi i dodaci za prozore motornih vozila: Prozorsko staklo; Podizač stakla; Prozorske brtve; Sustavi i komponente brisača vjetrobranskog stakla
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Kfz-Teile > Teile für Kfz-Fenster: Fensterglas; Fensterheber; Fensterdichtungen; Scheibenwischersysteme und -komponenten
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli za motorna vozila > Deli in dodatki za stekla motornih vozil: Stekla za okna; Regulatorji oken; Tesnila za okna; Sistemi in komponente brisalcev vetrobranskega stekla
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων > Μέρη & αξεσουάρ παραθύρων μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων: Τζάμι παραθύρου; Ρυθμιστές παραθύρων; Διατάξεις στεγανοποίησης παραθύρων; Συστήματα & εξαρτήματα υαλοκαθαριστήρων παρμπρίζ
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 机动车零部件 > 汽车车窗零件/配件: 车窗玻璃; 车窗升降器; 车窗密封条; 挡风玻璃雨刮系统和部件
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Piezas para vehículos motorizados > Piezas y accesorios para ventanillas: Vidrio de ventana; Reguladores de ventanas; Juntas de ventanas; Sistemas y componentes de limpiaparabrisas
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely motorových vozidiel > Diely a príslušenstvo okien motorových vozidiel: Okenné sklo; Okenné regulátory; Tesnenia okien; Systémy a komponenty stieračov čelného skla
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonsdelar > Fönsterdelar till motorfordon: Fönsterglas; Fönsterregulatorer; Fönstertätningar; Vindrutetorkarsystem och komponenter
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Автомобильные запчасти > Детали и аксессуары для автомобильных окон: Стекло для окон; Регуляторы окон; Уплотнители для окон; Системы и компоненты стеклоочистителей
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele til motorkøretøjer > Vinduesdele til motorkøretøjer: Vinduesglas; Vinduesregulatorer; Vinduespakninger; Vinduesviskersystemer og komponenter